Utah statutes.
63A-2-405.   Charges and fees assessed for surplus property.

If approved in accordance with Sections 63A-1-114 and 63J-1-410, the division:

(1)  may assess charges and fees for the acquisition, warehousing, distribution, or transfer of any property of the United States for educational, public health, or civil defense purposes, including research, only if those charges and fees are reasonably related to the division's care and handling costs of acquiring, receipting, warehousing, distributing, or transferring the property;

(2)  may reduce or eliminate charges on property that is found not to be usable for the purpose for which it was procured; and

(3)  shall limit the charges and fees assessed against real property to the reasonable administrative costs that the division incurred in effecting transfer.

